Utah statutes.
7-15-3.   Liability of financial institution upon wrongful dishonor.

If a person is liable to a holder under Section 7-15-1 or under a contract with a depository institution as provided in Subsection 7-15-1(9), and the liability is proximately caused by a financial institution's wrongful dishonor under Section 70A-4-402, any award against the financial institution under Section 70A-4-402 shall include all amounts awarded against the person to the holder under:

(1)  Section 7-15-1; or

(2)  the contract with the depository institution as provided in Subsection 7-15-1(9).

